Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-207
Unauthorized change in service; claim procedures.

(1) Nothing in the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act shall preclude a subscriber from electing to resolve an unauthorized change of service directly with the unauthorized telecommunications company. If the subscriber is unsatisfied with the resolution from the unauthorized telecommunications company, the subscriber may file a complaint with the commission. The complaint may be made by letter, fax, online notification, or telephone call to the commission. The subscriber may be required to provide a copy of the subscriber's telephone bill that contains the alleged unauthorized telecommunications company's charges.

(2) The commission, consistent with federal regulations for changing long distance service under subpart K of 47 C.F.R. part 64, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2002, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for resolution of subscriber complaints of an unauthorized change of service.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 389, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-1907;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 69.